Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-610.02
Subpoena; witness; failure to appear; penalty.

Contempt of court under section 29-610.01 shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than five hundred dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding thirty days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Laws 1974, LB 684, § 2.